Missouri, session 2026, HB2929.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 167.131, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 167.131, to read as follows:
167.131. 1. The board of education of each district in this state that does not maintain
a high school offering work through the twelfth grade shall pay tuition as calculated by the
receiving district under subsection 2 of this section and provide transportation consistent with
the provisions of section 167.241 for each pupil resident therein who has completed the work
of the highest grade offered in the schools of the district and who attends an accredited public
high school in another district of the same or an adjoining county.
2. The rate of tuition to be charged by the district attended and paid by the sending
district is the per pupil cost of maintaining the district's grade level grouping which includes
the school attended. The cost of maintaining a grade level grouping shall be determined by
the board of education of the district but in no case shall it exceed all amounts spent for
teachers' wages, incidental purposes, debt service, maintenance and replacements. The term
"debt service", as used in this section, means expenditures for the retirement of bonded
indebtedness and expenditures for interest on bonded indebtedness. Per pupil cost of the
grade level grouping shall be determined by dividing the cost of maintaining the grade level
grouping by the average daily pupil attendance. If there is disagreement as to the amount of
tuition to be paid, the facts shall be submitted to the state board of education, and its decision
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2929 2
in the matter shall be final. Subject to the limitations of this section, each pupil shall be free
to attend the public school of his or her choice.
3. The rate of tuition to be charged by the district attended and paid by the
sending district shall be determined and provided to the sending district before March
first for the next school year. If the rate of tuition is not provided to the sending district
by the district attended by such date, the current rate of tuition shall apply.
✔